Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.048

Professional limited liability company—Licensing.

(1) No limited liability company formed under this chapter may render professional services except through a person or persons who are duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional services within this state. However, this chapter does not:

(a) Prohibit a person duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services in any jurisdiction other than this state from becoming a member of a professional limited liability company formed in this state for the purpose of rendering the same professional services; or

(b) Prohibit a professional limited liability company from rendering services outside this state through individuals who are not duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to render professional services within this state.

(2) Persons engaged in a profession and otherwise meeting the requirements of this chapter may operate under this chapter as a professional limited liability company so long as each member personally engaged in the practice of the profession in this state is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this state and:

(a) At least one manager of the limited liability company is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this state; or

(b) A member is in charge of each office of the limited liability company in this state and that member is duly licensed or otherwise legally authorized to practice the profession in this state.

[ 2015 c 188 s 14.]